District of Columbia statutes.
38-632

Administration of medication by a public school employee.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 5, 1993, D.C. Law 10-55, § 3, 40 DCR 7219
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 24, 41 DCR 5193
Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 14, 54 DCR 12230

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2432.

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 38-631.